Utah statutes.
4-14-8.   Suspension or revocation -- Grounds -- Stop sale, use, or removal
order authorized -- Court action -- Procedure -- Award of costs authorized.
(1) The department may revoke or suspend the registration of any pesticide
upon satisfactory evidence that the registrant has used fraudulent or
deceptive practices in the registration of the pesticide or in its
distribution in this state.
(2)  The department may issue a "stop sale, use, or removal order" to the
owner or distributor of any designated pesticide or lot of pesticide which it
finds or has reason to believe is being offered or exposed for sale in
violation of this chapter. The order shall be in writing and no pesticide
subject to it shall be moved, offered, or exposed for sale, except upon the
subsequent written release by the department. Before a release is issued, the
department may require the owner or distributor of the "stopped" pesticide or
lot to pay the expense incurred by the department in connection with the
withdrawal of the product from the market.
(3)  The department is authorized in a court of competent jurisdiction to seek
an order of seizure or condemnation of a pesticide which violates this chapter
or, upon proper grounds, to obtain a temporary restraining order or permanent
injunction to prevent the violation of this chapter. No bond shall be required
of the department in an injunctive proceeding brought under this section.
(4)  If condemnation is ordered, the pesticide or equipment shall be disposed
of as the court directs; provided, that in no event shall it order
condemnation without giving the registrant or other person an opportunity to
apply to the court for permission to relabel, reprocess, or otherwise bring
the pesticide into conformance, or for permission to remove it from the state.
(5)  If the court orders condemnation, court costs, fees, storage, and other
costs shall be awarded against the claimant of the pesticide or equipment.
